California, session 20252026, SB420.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 214.12 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:214.12. (a) For purposes of Section 214, “property used exclusively for religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable purposes” shall not include property, or any portion thereof, operated as a detention facility by a for-profit entity. facility.(b) For purposes of this section, “detention facility” shall have the same meaning as is provided in Section 9500 of the Penal Code. (c) The Legislature finds and declares that this section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.